hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
AF VD	# 304
AF VDVC	# 305
AF VDUY	# 306
AF VDUS	# 307
AF VDUA	# 308
AF VC	# 309
AF VCUS	# 310
AF VCUF	# 311
AF VB	# 312
AF VBUJ	# 313
AF VBUF	# 314
AF VBUA	# 315
AF VBTT	# 316
AF VA	# 317
AF VAUA	# 318
AF UZ	# 319
AF UZUI	# 320
AF UX	# 321
AF UXUN	# 322
AF UXUJ	# 323
AF UW	# 324
AF UWUJ	# 325
AF UWUJUA	# 326
AF UWUA	# 327
AF UV	# 328
AF UVUO	# 329
AF UVUN	# 330
AF UU	# 331
AF UUVC	# 332
AF UUVCUS	# 333
AF UUUS	# 334
AF UUUN	# 335
AF UUUF	# 336
AF UT	# 337
AF UQ	# 338
AF UQUA	# 339
AF UP	# 340
AF UPUV	# 341
AF UPUJTPUA	# 342
AF UPUE	# 343
AF UPUA	# 344
AF UPTQ	# 345
AF UO	# 346
AF UOUE	# 347
AF UN	# 348
AF UNUV	# 349
AF UNUR	# 350
AF UNURUC	# 351
AF UNUE	# 352
AF UM	# 353
AF UMUE	# 354
AF UMUB	# 355
AF UMUA	# 356
AF UL	# 357
AF UKUB	# 358
AF UE	# 359
AF TZ	# 360
AF TZVB	# 361
AF TZUI	# 362
AF TZUIUA	# 363
AF TZUH	# 364
AF TZUA	# 365
AF TZUI	# 366
AF TZTWUI	# 367
AF TZTT	# 368
AF TZTTUI	# 369
AF TZTS	# 370
AF TZTR	# 371
AF TY	# 372
AF TYUI	# 373
AF TYUH	# 374
AF TYUA	# 375
AF TYTTUI	# 376
AF TX	# 377
AF TW	# 378
AF TWUI	# 379
AF TV	# 380
AF TVUI	# 381
AF TVUH	# 382
AF TVTT	# 383
AF TVTTUI	# 384
AF TVTS	# 385
AF TU	# 386
AF TR	# 387
AF TRUI	# 388
AF TRUH	# 389
AF TRUE	# 390
AF TRTT	# 391
AF TL	# 392
AF TLUA	# 393
AF TK	# 394
AF TJ	# 395
AF TITTUI	# 396
AF TH	# 397
AF TG	# 398
AF TF	# 399
AF TE	# 400
AF TD	# 401
AF THTGTETC	# 402
AF TB	# 403
AF TA	# 404
AF SZ	# 405
AF SY	# 406
AF SX	# 407
AF SW	# 408
AF SV	# 409
AF SU	# 410
AF THTG	# 411
AF ST	# 412
AF SS	# 413
AF SOSPSR	# 414
AF SMSNSR	# 415
AF SL	# 416


SFX XZ Y      21
SFX XZ ati    am         ati
SFX XZ ati    aš         ati
SFX XZ ati    a          ati
SFX XZ ati    amo        ati
SFX XZ ati    ate        ati
SFX XZ ati    aju        ati
SFX XZ ati    ah         ati
SFX XZ ati    aše        ati
SFX XZ ati    asmo       ati
SFX XZ ati    aste       ati
SFX XZ ati    ahu        ati
SFX XZ ati    aj         ati
SFX XZ ati    ajmo       ati
SFX XZ ati    ajte       ati
SFX XZ ati    ao         ati
SFX XZ ati    ala        ati
SFX XZ ati    alo        ati
SFX XZ ati    ali        ati
SFX XZ ati    ale        ati
SFX XZ ati    ajući      ati
SFX XZ ati    at         ati

SFX XY Y      63
SFX XY ovati  ujem       ovati
SFX XY ovati  uješ       ovati
SFX XY ovati  uje        ovati
SFX XY ovati  ujemo      ovati
SFX XY ovati  ujete      ovati
SFX XY ovati  uju        ovati
SFX XY ivati  ujem       ivati
SFX XY ivati  uješ       ivati
SFX XY ivati  uje        ivati
SFX XY ivati  ujemo      ivati
SFX XY ivati  ujete      ivati
SFX XY ivati  uju        ivati
SFX XY evati  ujem       evati
SFX XY evati  uješ       evati
SFX XY evati  uje        evati
SFX XY evati  ujemo      evati
SFX XY evati  ujete      evati
SFX XY evati  uju        evati
SFX XY uvati  ujem       uvati
SFX XY uvati  uješ       uvati
SFX XY uvati  uje        uvati
SFX XY uvati  ujemo      uvati
SFX XY uvati  ujete      uvati
SFX XY uvati  uju        uvati
SFX XY avati  ajem       avati
SFX XY avati  aješ       avati
SFX XY avati  aje        avati
SFX XY avati  ajemo      avati
SFX XY avati  ajete      avati
SFX XY avati  aju        avati
SFX XY ati    ah         ati
SFX XY ati    aše        ati
SFX XY ati    a          ati
SFX XY ati    asmo       ati
SFX XY ati    aste       ati
SFX XY ati    ahu        ati
SFX XY ovati  uj         ovati
SFX XY ovati  ujmo       ovati
SFX XY ovati  ujte       ovati
SFX XY ivati  uj         ivati
SFX XY ivati  ujmo       ivati
SFX XY ivati  ujte       ivati
SFX XY evati  uj         evati
SFX XY evati  ujmo       evati
SFX XY evati  ujte       evati
SFX XY uvati  uj         uvati
SFX XY uvati  ujmo       uvati
SFX XY uvati  ujte       uvati
SFX XY avati  aj         avati
SFX XY avati  ajmo       avati
SFX XY avati  ajte       avati
SFX XY ati    ao         ati
SFX XY ati    ala        ati
SFX XY ati    alo        ati
SFX XY ati    ali        ati
SFX XY ati    ale        ati
SFX XY avati  ajući      avati
SFX XY avati  avajući    avati
SFX XY ovati  ujući      ovati
SFX XY ivati  ujući      ivati
SFX XY evati  ujući      evati
SFX XY uvati  ujući      uvati
SFX XY ati    at         ati

SFX XX Y      13
SFX XX iti    im         iti
SFX XX iti    iš         iti
SFX XX iti    i          iti
SFX XX iti    imo        iti
SFX XX iti    ite        iti
SFX XX iti    e          iti
SFX XX iti    io         iti
SFX XX iti    ila        iti
SFX XX iti    ilo        iti
SFX XX iti    ili        iti
SFX XX iti    ile        iti
SFX XX iti    eći        iti
SFX XX iti    it         iti

SFX XW Y      13
SFX XW jeti   im         jeti
SFX XW jeti   iš         jeti
SFX XW jeti   i          jeti
SFX XW jeti   imo        jeti
SFX XW jeti   ite        jeti
SFX XW jeti   e          jeti
SFX XW jeti   io         jeti
SFX XW jeti   jela       jeti
SFX XW jeti   jelo       jeti
SFX XW jeti   jeli       jeti
SFX XW jeti   jele       jeti
SFX XW jeti   eći        jeti
SFX XW jeti   jet        jeti

SFX XV Y      16
SFX XV jeti   ijem       jeti
SFX XV jeti   iješ       jeti
SFX XV jeti   ije        jeti
SFX XV jeti   ijemo      jeti
SFX XV jeti   ijete      jeti
SFX XV jeti   iju        jeti
SFX XV jeti   ij         jeti
SFX XV jeti   ijmo       jeti
SFX XV jeti   ijte       jeti
SFX XV jeti   jeo        jeti
SFX XV jeti   jela       jeti
SFX XV jeti   jelo       jeti
SFX XV jeti   jeli       jeti
SFX XV jeti   jele       jeti
SFX XV jeti   ijući      jeti
SFX XV jeti   jet        jeti

SFX XU Y      42
SFX XU ti     jem        iti
SFX XU ti     ješ        iti
SFX XU ti     je         iti
SFX XU ti     jemo       iti
SFX XU ti     jete       iti
SFX XU ti     ju         iti
SFX XU ti     jah        iti
SFX XU ti     jaše       iti
SFX XU ti     jasmo      iti
SFX XU ti     jaste      iti
SFX XU ti     jahu       iti
SFX XU ti     j          iti
SFX XU ti     jmo        iti
SFX XU ti     jte        iti
SFX XU ti     o          iti
SFX XU ti     la         iti
SFX XU ti     lo         iti
SFX XU ti     li         iti
SFX XU ti     le         iti
SFX XU ti     jući       iti
SFX XU ti     t          iti
SFX XU sti    sem        sti
SFX XU sti    seš        sti
SFX XU sti    se         sti
SFX XU sti    semo       sti
SFX XU sti    sete       sti
SFX XU sti    su         sti
SFX XU sti    sijah      sti
SFX XU sti    sijaše     sti
SFX XU sti    sijasmo    sti
SFX XU sti    sijaste    sti
SFX XU sti    sijahu     sti
SFX XU sti    si         sti
SFX XU sti    simo       sti
SFX XU sti    site       sti
SFX XU sti    sao        sti
SFX XU sti    sla        sti
SFX XU sti    slo        sti
SFX XU sti    sli        sti
SFX XU sti    sle        sti
SFX XU sti    sući       sti
SFX XU sti    st         sti

SFX XT Y      42
SFX XT ljeti  eljem      ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  elješ      ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  elje       ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljemo     ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljete     ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  elju       ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljah      ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljaše     ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljasmo    ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljaste    ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljahu     ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  elji       ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljimo     ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljite     ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  ljeo       ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  ljela      ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  ljelo      ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  ljeli      ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  ljele      ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  eljući     ljeti
SFX XT ljeti  ljet       ljeti
SFX XT ijeti  em         ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  eš         ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  e          ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  emo        ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  ete        ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  u          ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  ah         ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  aše        ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  asmo       ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  aste       ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  ahu        ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  i          ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  imo        ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  ite        ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  o          ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  la         ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  lo         ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  li         ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  le         ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  ući        ijeti
SFX XT ijeti  ijet       ijeti

AF XZUR	# 31
AF XZURUD	# 33
AF XZURUC	# 34
AF XZUD	# 39
AF XYUR	# 44
AF XYURUD	# 45
AF XYURUC	# 47
AF XX	# 50
AF XXXF	# 52
AF XXXE	# 56
AF XXXD	# 58
AF XXXC	# 62
AF XXXB	# 64
AF XW	# 67
AF XWXC	# 68
AF XWXCXVXB	# 69
AF XWXCUR	# 70
AF XWXCURUD	# 71
AF XWXB	# 72
AF XWWT	# 73
AF XU	# 74
AF XUWE	# 75
AF XT	# 76
