hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.dic
amputirati/33
ažurirati/33
bazdjeti/68
bdjeti/69
bistriti/52
biti/74
blagoizvoljeti/68
boljeti/68
bordirati/34
braniti/56
bridjeti/68
bučiti/52
buktjeti/68
ceptjeti/68
cijepiti/58
čarati/34
čeličiti/52
četovati/44
ćelavjeti/68
daždjeti/68
dekontaminirati/33
dezinformirati/33
diviti/58
dograđivati/47
domicilirati/33
doskakivati/44
drhtjeti/67
družiti/52
drvenjeti/70
ekipirati/33
favorizirati/33
garaviti/58
gatati/34
gnjiljeti/70
gnjiti/74
goniti/56
gorjeti/72
grgoljiti/52
hajdukovati/44
haračiti/52
hazardirati/31
hladnjeti/68
inhibirati/33
ishoditi/62
isparavati/34
isplaćivati/47
izgrđivati/47
izobražavati/34
jadovati/44
jariti/52
karati/34
kasniti/64
kočiti/52
kolorirati/33
koordinirati/33
kopnjeti/68
krečiti/52
kriti/74
kruliti/56
krupnjeti/68
kusati/31
kvasiti/62
letjeti/68
liti/74
loviti/58
ljuljuškati/34
migoljiti/52
mljeti/76
mokriti/52
moljakati/34
mudrijašiti/52
nadraživati/47
nadživjeti/68
nahuškavati/34
nasićivati/44
nastrijeti/76
navoziti/62
neinformirati/33
nesti/74
obeščašćivati/47
očekivati/47
odbrojavati/34
oduživati/44
odvoditi/62
oksidirati/33
onesposobljivati/45
oskvrnjivati/47
otplaćivati/47
paralizirati/33
pasti/75
pazariti/52
piti/74
plaviti/58
pocrnjivati/47
pohrvaćivati/47
pokušavati/34
posjećivati/47
potpisivati/47
preinačivati/47
premjeravati/34
prešućivati/47
preživjeti/68
prikačiti/62
primjećivati/47
pritrčavati/31
produživati/47
prosjačiti/52
prozračivati/47
prtiti/62
raskopavati/34
rastiskivati/47
razmrsivati/47
raznositi/50
relaksirati/33
riti/74
sanjariti/52
sijediti/68
sjedati/31
skraćivati/45
snubiti/58
stupnjevati/45
surfati/31
suživjeti/68
svidjeti/68
šarafiti/64
šiti/74
štedjeti/68
šumjeti/67
teliti/56
tračati/31
tresti/74
truniti/56
učvršćivati/47
ulizivati/47
upredati/39
urazumljivati/47
ušteđivati/44
uvidjeti/68
vidjeti/73
visiti/62
visjeti/67
viti/74
vjerovati/44
voljeti/67
voljeti/68
vrvjeti/68
vulkanizirati/34
zakašnjivati/44
zapljuskivati/47
zavaljivati/47
zrikati/31
zriti/74
žalostiti/64
žednjeti/68
željeti/71
živjeti/68
žudjeti/68
žutjeti/68
